District of Columbia statutes.
38-904

School name changes.

(a)

The school formerly known as the M Street High School (old) shall be known as Robert Gould Shaw Junior High School.

(b)

The school formerly known as Central High School (old) and annex shall be known as Columbia Junior High School.

June 29, 1922, 42 Stat. 689, ch. 249
1981 Ed., § 31-2204.
1973 Ed., § 31-1106.